Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB250.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(d) of the act of November 29, 2004 (P.L.1376, No.178), known as the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Alternative Fuels Incentive Fund.* * *(d) Rebate program.--There is [hereby] established a rebate program within the department for individuals residing in this Commonwealth who purchase a hybrid, plug-in hybrid or other alternative fuel vehicle as follows:1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) [The] Except as provided under paragraph (4), the department shall establish a formula and method for the awarding of rebates under this program. The department shall publish this information yearly in the Pennsylvania Bulletin and may also publish this information on the department's [World Wide Web site] publicly accessible Internet website. Rebates shall be provided to the extent that funding is available for this purpose. [To] Except as provided under paragraph (4), to the extent that applications for rebates exceed the available funds for this program, the department may award rebates on a pro rata basis.(2) A request for a rebate must be submitted to the department no later than six months after the purchase date of the hybrid, plug-in hybrid or other alternative fuel vehicle, in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department shall provide an application form to an individual upon request, and the department may make the application form [on its World Wide Web site] available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website or through the place of purchase of a hybrid, plug-in hybrid or other alternative fuel vehicle.(3) Applicants shall provide a copy of a valid Pennsylvania vehicle registration and proof of purchase when making a request for a rebate under this program.(4) Rebates awarded for new, preowned and demonstration vehicles with a final purchase price of $50,000 or less shall be in the following amounts:(i) $3,000 for the purchase of a new hydrogen fuel cell vehicle or battery electric vehicle.(ii) $1,500 for the purchase of a new plug-in 20250HB0250PN0163 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electric vehicle.(iii) $1,000 for the purchase of a new hybrid vehicle, compressed natural gas vehicle, propane-fueled vehicle, single line ground fault electric vehicle or electric motorcycle, excluding electric scooters.(iv) $1,000 for the purchase of a one-time preowned qualifying vehicle purchased from a registered dealer with an odometer reading of 75,000 miles or less.(v) $1,000 for the purchase of a qualifying demonstration vehicle purchased from a registered dealer with an odometer reading of more than 500 miles and less than 10,000 miles.(5) An applicant for a rebate whose total household income does not exceed 200% of the Federal poverty level, as defined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, shall be eligible to receive an additional $2,000 rebate.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0250PN0163 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718